src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection
!! ----

!! ## Ad hoc lexica

LEXICON N-continutation ! this lexicon made on model from mhr, please adjust ad lib
 N_ ;
 

LEXICON NTag
  N_ ;

! SNM: ensure there is a space before the jspwiki markup __ when the preceding
! character (ie last of lexicon name) is also an _ char - otherwise one gets a
! jspwiki syntax error.
LEXICON N_  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! +WORK: K ; ! comment out WORK tag for Korp
K ;

!! ## Substandard and other lexica, i.e., hunspell

LEXICON N_KOL_rus100
: N_KOL ;

!LEXICON N_KOL_SUB !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! +Err/Orth: N_KOL ;

!LEXICON N_TYERVYE_SUB !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! +Err/Orth: N_TYERVYE ;


LEXICON N-continuation
N_ ; ! to be fixed

!! ## Standard lexica 

LEXICON N_KOL !!= @CODE@ кол:кол
!! Back harmony
  N_KOL-SG ;
  N_KOL-PL ;
LEXICON N_KOL-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_KOL-SG ;
LEXICON N_KOL-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_KOL-PL ;

LEXICON N_MOER !!= @CODE@ мӧр:мӧр
!! Front harmony
  N_MOER-SG ;
  N_MOER-PL ;
LEXICON N_MOER-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_MOER-SG ;
LEXICON N_MOER-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_MOER-PL ;

LEXICON N_MARY !!≈ * **@CODE@** мары:мары
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Back harmony
  N_MARY-SG ;
  N_MARY-PL ;
LEXICON N_MARY-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_MARY-SG ;
LEXICON N_MARY-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_MARY-PL ;

LEXICON N_TYERVYE !!≈ * **@CODE@** тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Front harmony
  N_TYERVYE-SG ;
  N_TYERVYE-PL ;
LEXICON N_TYERVYE-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_TYERVYE-SG ;
LEXICON N_TYERVYE-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_TYERVYE-PL ;

!LEXICON N_KARTA_SUB
!!! @LEXNAME@
! +Err/Orth: N_KARTA ;

LEXICON N_KARTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** карта:карта
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы or ӹ
!! Back harmony
  N_KARTA-SG ;
  N_KARTA-PL ;
LEXICON N_KARTA-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_KARTA-SG ;
LEXICON N_KARTA-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_KARTA-PL ;

LEXICON N_BIRZHA !!≈ * **@CODE@** биржа:биржа
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
!! Front harmony
  N_BIRZHA-SG ;
  N_BIRZHA-PL ;
LEXICON N_BIRZHA-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_BIRZHA-SG ;
LEXICON N_BIRZHA-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_BIRZHA-PL ;

LEXICON N_VAREN1E !!≈ * **@CODE@** варенье:варенье
!! е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
!! Front harmony
  N_VAREN1E-SG ;
  N_VAREN1E-PL ;
LEXICON N_VAREN1E-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_VAREN1E-SG ;
LEXICON N_VAREN1E-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_VAREN1E-PL ;

LEXICON N_POCHTA !!= @CODE@  почта:почта
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK   ;
        :%{front%} NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK     ; !!!!
        :%{front%} NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;
 +Sg+Nom:%{back%} K                                ;

!LEXICON N_OLMA_SUB
! +Err/Orth: N_OLMA ;
LEXICON N_OLMA !!= @CODE@  олма:олма
!! Back harmony
  N_OLMA-SG ;
  N_OLMA-PL ;
LEXICON N_OLMA-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_OLMA-SG ;
LEXICON N_OLMA-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_OLMA-PL ;

LEXICON N_AEZAE !!= @CODE@  ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
!! Front harmony
   N_AEZAE-SG ;
   N_AEZAE-PL ;
LEXICON N_AEZAE-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_AEZAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_AEZAE-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_AEZAE-PL ;

LEXICON N_PECHEN1E !!= @CODE@  печенье:печенье
!! Front harmony
  N_PECHEN1E-SG ;
  N_PECHEN1E-PL ;
LEXICON N_PECHEN1E-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_PECHEN1E-SG ;
LEXICON N_PECHEN1E-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_PECHEN1E-PL ;

!!
LEXICON NMN_KOL !!= @CODE@ кол:кол
!! Back harmony
  NMN_KOL-SG ;
  NMN_KOL-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_KOL-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                              ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_KOL-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

LEXICON NMN_MOER !!= @CODE@ мӧр:мӧр
!! Front harmony
  NMN_MOER-SG ;
  NMN_MOER-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_MOER-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_MOER-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON NMN_MARY !!≈ * **@CODE@** мары:мары
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Back harmony
  NMN_MARY-SG ;
  NMN_MARY-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_MARY-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                              ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_MARY-PL
            NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL      ;
            NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK          ;
! +PxSg1:эм PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE !!≈ * **@CODE@** тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Front harmony
  NMN_TYERVYE-SG ;
  NMN_TYERVYE-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE-PL
            NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL      ;
            NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT         ;
! +PxSg1:эм PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_KARTA	 !!≈ * **@CODE@** карта:карта
!! Back а/ы
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы
  NMN_KARTA-SG ;
  NMN_KARTA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_KARTA-SG
 +Sg+Nom:    K                              ;
        :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
        :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_KARTA-PL
 :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
 :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

!LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA	 !!≈ * **@CODE@** биржа:биржа
!!! Front а/ӹ
!!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ
!  NMN_BIRZHA-SG ;
!  NMN_BIRZHA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA-SG
  +Sg+Nom:       K                               ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA-PL
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; !!= * **@CODE@** %>влӓ
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

!LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E	 !!≈ * **@CODE@** варенье:варенье
!!! Front е/ӹ
!!! е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ
!  NMN_VAREN1E-SG ;
!  NMN_VAREN1E-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E-SG
  +Sg+Nom:       K                               ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E-PL
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; !!= * **@CODE@** %>влӓ
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON NMN_OLMA !!= @CODE@  олма:олма
!! Back harmony
  NMN_OLMA-SG ;
  NMN_OLMA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_OLMA-SG
        +Sg+Nom:                    K                              ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;
! +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC:эм                  K                              ;
! +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC:ет                  K                              ;
! +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP:%>еш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                              ;

LEXICON NMN_OLMA-PL
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:эмвлӓ K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:мвлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NPC:влӓэм K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:етвлӓ K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:твлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP:влӓэт K                                ;

LEXICON NMN_AEZAE !!= @CODE@  ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
!! Front harmony
  NMN_AEZAE-SG ;
  NMN_AEZAE-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_AEZAE-SG
        +Sg+Nom:                    K                               ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
! +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC:эм                  K                               ;
! +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC:ет                  K                               ;
! +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP:%>еш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                               ;

LEXICON NMN_AEZAE-PL
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:эмвлӓ K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:мвлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NPC:влӓэм K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:етвлӓ K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:твлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP:влӓэт K                                ;

!LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E !!= @CODE@  печенье:печенье
!!! Front harmony
!  NMN_PECHEN1E-SG ;
!  NMN_PECHEN1E-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON N_AEVAE !!= @CODE@  ӓвӓ:ӓвӓ
                           :%{front%}                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT  ;
                           :%{front%}             NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                           :%{front%}%^KIN               NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT    ; !!!!
                           :%{front%}%^KIN               NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

                    +Sg+Nom:%{front%}                    K                                ;
              +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC:%{front%}%>эм                  K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC:%{front%}%>м                   K                                ; !! Special
              +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:%{front%}%>эмвлӓ               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:%{front%}%>мвлӓ                K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NPC:влӓэм               K                                ;
              +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC:%{front%}%>ет                  K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC:%{front%}%>т                   K                                ; !! Special
              +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:%{front%}%>етвлӓ               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:твлӓ                K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP:влӓэт               K                                ;
! !2013-10-18!+Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP:%>эш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                                ;

!!

LEXICON PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Abe:влӓде    K ;
  +Pl+Acc:%>влӓм   K ;
  +Pl+Com:%>влӓге  K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr:%>влӓлӓ  K ;
  +Pl+Dat:%>влӓлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>влӓн   K ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓшкӹ K ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓш   K ;
  +Pl+Ine:%>влӓштӹ K ;
  +Pl+Lat:%>влӓэш  K ;
  +Pl+Nom:%>влӓ    K ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG        ; !!!!!!
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG
  +Sg+Gen:%>%{ыӹØ%}н    K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>%{ыӹØ%}м    K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге          K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>л%{аӓ%}н    K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹ%} K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹ%} K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}ш    K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш          K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>л%{аӓ%}     K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де          K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK
  +Sg+Gen:%>ын   K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>ым   K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге   K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>лан  K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>ышты K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ышкы K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ыш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш   K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>ла   K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де   K ; ! (without a village)
